Missouri, session 2026, HB6.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 6.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 2
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. An
appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of a one-time
amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed to be a
component part of, and not in addition to, the stated appropriation
amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified as “one-
time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to any
ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 6.005. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 6.135
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
For the Office of the Director, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal services and expense and equipment
Personal Service (including $195,559 one-time) ...............................................552,911
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................4,593
Expense and Equipment (including $5,909,599 one-time) ..................... 9,069,584
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................9,627,088
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Agriculture Federal Stimulus Fund (2395) ...................................200,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................851,421
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................12,277

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 3
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 122,956
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................986,654
Personal Service ....................................................................................................33,542
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................916
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,721
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)..........................................................................37,179
Personal Service ....................................................................................................31,416
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................242
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,727
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ...........................................................34,385
Personal Service ....................................................................................................96,914
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................2,032
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,964
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ........................................................................104,910
Personal Service ....................................................................................................27,172
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................852
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,714
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ........................................................................29,738
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,858
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................139
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,451
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................................55,448
Personal Service ..................................................................................................109,627
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................1,948
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,195
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ........................................................................118,770
Personal Service ..................................................................................................116,414
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 4
RSMo ......................................................................................................................2,318
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,380
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ....................................................................................126,112
For the Missouri Food and Beverage Task Force
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,000,000
For refunds of erroneous receipts due to errors in application for licenses,
registrations, permits, certificates, subscriptions, or other fees
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................13,500
For the monitoring and regulation of foreign ownership of agricultural
land
Personal Service ..................................................................................................170,510
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................154
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,290
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 189,954
Total (Not to exceed 24.10 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$14,573,738
Section 6.010. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterinary Student Loan Payment Fund
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .............................................................................$360,000
Section 6.015. To the Department of Agriculture
For large animal veterinary student loans in accordance with the
provisions of Sections 340.375 to 340.396, RSMo
From Veterinary Student Loan Payment Fund (1803) .................................................$420,000
Section 6.020. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.135
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,415,449
Expense and Equipment (including $32,800 one-time) ........................... 71,900
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,487,349

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 5
For the Agriculture Business Development Division, provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................79,442
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 423,886
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................503,328
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,167
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 76,735
From Agriculture Business Development Fund (1683) ....................................................81,902
Personal Service ....................................................................................................18,288
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 275,638
From AgriMissouri Fund (1897) ....................................................................................293,926
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,504,890
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 430,963
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ...................................................................1,935,853
For the Governor’s Conference on Agriculture
From Agriculture Business Development Fund (1683) ....................................................75,000
For urban and non-traditional agriculture
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................25,000
For competitive grants to innovative projects that promote agriculture in
urban/suburban communities
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................50,000
For supporting farmers’ markets and other economic development
initiatives that work to reduce food insecurity in areas which have
been designated an urbanized area by the United States Census
Bureau
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For supporting farmers’ markets and other economic development
initiatives that work to reduce food insecurity in areas which have
been designated a rural area by the United States Census Bureau
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................100,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 6
For a non-profit charitable organization that produces and distributes free
organic vegetables at a 2 acre garden site to seniors, veterans,
youth and low-income families with the goal of raising health
levels located in any city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................25,000
For applying for a grant under the United States Department of
Agriculture's Senior farmers' market nutrition program, and
applying for a grant and submitting a state plan under that United
States department's Women, Infants and Children farmers'
market nutrition program, for the purpose of providing low-
income seniors and pregnant and postpartum women, infants, and
children under five years of age who are found to be at nutritional
risk with vouchers or other approved and acceptable methods of
payment including, but not limited to, electronic cards that may
be used to purchase eligible foods at farmers' markets
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,025
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 59,402
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................110,427
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................235,070
For the Abattoir Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1
Total (Not to exceed 49.56 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,422,856
Section 6.021. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For a research farm located in a county with more than three thousand
six hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants for
industrial hemp varieties to use in commercial production
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 6.022. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 7
For competitive grants to established dairies in the state to increase
efficiency and grow the dairy industry, provided the maximum
amount of each grant is $40,000 per farm
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
For competitive grants to established beef producers in the state to
increase production in commercial herds and in small purebred
herds with less than 50 mature cows, provided the maximum
amount of each grant is $40,000 per farm
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 6.023. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For an organization located in any city with more than fourteen thousand
but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and located in a
county with more than one million inhabitants that provides food
assistance to individuals and families facing food insecurity
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ............................................................................................................$60,000
Section 6.024. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For planning, design, and construction of a soybean cyst nematode
laboratory facility that will be used for training, education,
technical support, and research on a land grant university located
in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, and provided
that a match be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$4,000,000
Section 6.025. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$1,755
For the Missouri Grown Program
Personal Service ....................................................................................................47,047
Expense and Equipment ................................................................................ 218,810
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ................................................................ 265,857

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 8
Total (Not to exceed 0.97 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$267,612
Section 6.030. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Wine and Grape Program, provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$11,397
For the Missouri Wine and Grape Board to facilitate the startup functions
and development of the new Fermentation and Research Center
within the Grape and Wine Institute located on a land grant
university located in any city with more than one hundred twenty-
five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants to promote research to enhance wine quality, address
industry challenges, expand market presence, and increase
extension services to local wineries and grape growers to increase
quality and yields
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,034,426
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,099,888
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................... 3,134,314
Total (Not to exceed 5.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$3,645,711
Section 6.035. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between funds and no flexibility is allowed between personal
service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$153,232
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,264
From Single-Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408) .............................162,496
Personal Service ....................................................................................................14,536
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,000
From Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Program Fund (1978) ..................................16,536

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 9
Expense and Equipment
From Agricultural Product Utilization Grant Fund (1413) ....................................................100
For a non-profit organization founded in 1929 to secure strategic
partnerships and financial resources to enhance, strengthen, and
support the educational and leadership opportunities that promote
premier leadership, personal growth and career success for
Missourians in Agricultural Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 800,000
Total (Not to exceed 3.20 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$979,132
Section 6.040. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Single-
Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Guarantee Fund, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between Sections
6.040, 6.050, and 6.060, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.135
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$5,000
Section 6.045. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees as provided in Sections 348.190 and 348.200, RSMo
From Single-Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Guarantee Fund (1409) ........................$201,046
Section 6.050. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Agricultural Product Utilization and Business Development Loan
Guarantee Fund, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 6.040, 6.050, and 6.060,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.135
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$15,000
Section 6.055. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees as provided in Sections 348.403, 348.408, and
348.409, RSMo
From Agricultural Product Utilization and Business Development Loan
Guarantee Fund (1411) .....................................................................................$624,501
Section 6.060. To the Department of Agriculture

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 10
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Guarantee Fund, provided
one hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 6.040, 6.050, and 6.060, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.135
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$5,000
Section 6.065. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees for loans administered by the Missouri Agricultural
and Small Business Development Authority for the purpose of
financing the purchase of livestock feed used to produce livestock
and input used to produce crops for the feeding of livestock,
provided the appropriation may not exceed $2,000,000
From Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Guarantee Fund (1914) ..............................$50,000
Section 6.070. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture Development Program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$105,647
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,744
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) .................................................................147,391
For all monies in the Agriculture Development Fund for investments,
reinvestments, and for emergency agricultural relief and
rehabilitation as provided by law
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) ...................................................... 100,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.60 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$247,391
Section 6.075. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri Dairy Industry Revitalization Act
From Missouri Dairy Industry Revitalization Fund (1414) ............................................$25,000
Section 6.080. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Animal Health, provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,435,421

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 11
Expense and Equipment (including $80,547 one-time) ........................... 1,225,664
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,661,085
For the Division of Animal Health, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,536,293
Expense and Equipment (including $639,564 one-time) ......................... 1,635,803
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................3,172,096
Personal Service ..................................................................................................137,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 967,067
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ......................................................1,104,219
Personal Service ..................................................................................................611,219
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 185,976
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)........................................................................797,195
Personal Service
From Livestock Brands Fund (1299) .....................................................................................142
Expense and Equipment
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) .........................................................................2,462
Expense and Equipment
From Puppy Protection Trust Fund (1985) .........................................................................5,000
Expense and Equipment
From Large Carnivore Fund (1988) ..................................................................................10,000
To support local efforts to spay and neuter cats and dogs
From Missouri Pet Spay/Neuter Fund (1747) ...................................................................50,000
To support the Livestock Brands Program
From Livestock Brands Fund (1299) ................................................................................30,698
For expenses incurred in regulating Missouri livestock markets
From Livestock Sales and Markets Fees Fund (1581)......................................................30,690
For processing livestock market bankruptcy claims

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 12
From Agriculture Bond Trustee Fund (1756) .................................................................129,000
For contributions, gifts, and grants in support of relief efforts to reduce
the suffering of abandoned animals
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ..................................................................5,000
For black vulture mitigation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,660,000
Total (Not to exceed 96.47 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,657,587
Section 6.085. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Animal Health
For indemnity payments and for indemnifying producers and owners of
livestock and poultry for preventing the spread of disease during
emergencies declared by the State Veterinarian, subject to the
approval by the Department of Agriculture, of a state match rate
up to fifty percent (50%), provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 6.135
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$10,000
Section 6.090. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,016,583
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 161,033
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,177,616
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing, provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds, and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................46,110
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 36,211
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................82,321
Expense and Equipment
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................105,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 13
Personal Service ....................................................................................................86,022
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,651
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406) ................................................117,673
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,120,870
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 633,709
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ............................................................. 3,754,579
Total (Not to exceed 93.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,237,189
Section 6.095. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing
For the Missouri Aquaculture Council
From Aquaculture Marketing Development Fund (1573) ................................................$7,000
For research, promotion, and market development of apples
From Apple Merchandising Fund (1615) ...........................................................................7,000
For the Missouri Wine Marketing and Research Council
From Missouri Wine Marketing and Research Development
Fund (1855) .............................................................................................. 60,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$74,000
Section 6.100. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Plant Industries, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds in this section and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,364,238
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,280,789
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................2,645,027
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,986,948
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,043,768
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ...................................................................4,030,716
For the Invasive Pest Control Program, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between funds in this section and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................40,321
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 71,388

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 14
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................111,709
Personal Service ..................................................................................................174,593
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 58,000
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................232,593
For the Boll Weevil Eradication Program, provided no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................54,040
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,657
From Boll Weevil Suppression and Eradication Fund (1823) ............................. 78,697
Total (Not to exceed 76.81 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,098,742
Section 6.101. To the Department of Agriculture
To the Missouri Fertilizer Control Board, as defined in 266.336
RSMo, for planning and establishing nutrient management.
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$450,000
Section 6.105. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 6.135
Personal Service ................................................................................................$843,776
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 546,159
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,389,935
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between funds, and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,091
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 50,000
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................101,091
Personal Service ..................................................................................................653,084
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 280,339
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................933,423

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 15
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,173,994
Expense and Equipment (including $275,850 one-time) ........................ 1,445,701
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ............................................................. 3,619,695
Total (Not to exceed 69.11 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,044,144
Section 6.110. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri Land Survey Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$58,653
For the Missouri Land Survey Program, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between funds
Personal Service ..................................................................................................921,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 246,832
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ...................................................................1,168,152
Personal Service ..................................................................................................230,605
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 80,000
From Department of Agriculture Land Survey Revolving Services
Fund (1426) .........................................................................................................310,605
For surveying corners and for records restorations, provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between funds
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................60,000
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ........................................................... 90,000
Total (Not to exceed 14.68 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,687,410
Section 6.115. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$764,189
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,589,608
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,575,837

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 16
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) .................................................................................5,165,445
Personal Service
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................... 666,941
Total (Not to exceed 63.38 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,596,575
Section 6.120. To the Department of Agriculture
For cash to start the Missouri State Fair
Expense and Equipment
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ....................................................................................$74,250
From State Fair Trust Fund (1951) ...................................................................... 9,900
Total ................................................................................................................................$84,150
Section 6.125. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair
For equipment replacement
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ......................................................................... 165,962
Total ..............................................................................................................................$415,962
Section 6.130. To the Department of Agriculture
For the State Milk Board, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.135
Personal Service ................................................................................................$141,160
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 852
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................142,012
For the State Milk Board, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................827,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 765,175
From State Milk Inspection Fee Fund (1645) ...................................................... 1,592,327
Total (Not to exceed 9.93 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,734,339
Section 6.135. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 17
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 6.200. To the Department of Natural Resources
For department operations, administration, and support, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.405
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,153,567
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................10,325
Expense and Equipment (including $13,214 one-time) .......................... 84,185
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,248,077
For department operations, administration, and support, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................604,573
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................6,052
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,434
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................717,059
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,516,557
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................35,637
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 507,874
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................4,060,068
Personal Service
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......................54,688
For implementation on the citizen engagement platform of a permitting
application providing transparency and two-way communication
for efficient and timely permitting, provided the department shall
procure services in compliance with Chapter 34 RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,000,000
For Contractual Audits

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 18
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................................75,000
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................78,000
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................... 150,000
Total (Not to exceed 76.71 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,382,892
Section 6.225. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Environmental Quality, provided fifteen percent
(15%) flexibility is allowed between programs and/or regional
offices, and fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 6.405
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,086,430
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 767,083
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,853,513
For the Division of Environmental Quality, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................14,657,881
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,718,868
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................18,376,749
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,342,190
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 112,039
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................1,454,229
Personal Service ....................................................................................................41,689
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 47,302
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ................................................88,991
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,441,208
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 248,829
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ...........................................................................2,690,037
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,272,332
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 86,010
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) .................................................1,358,342
Personal Service ..................................................................................................140,202

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 19
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 37,855
From Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Proceeds Fund
(1268) ..................................................................................................................178,057
Personal Service ..................................................................................................344,350
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,983
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ...........................................................393,333
Personal Service ..................................................................................................325,153
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 38,728
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos
Fee Subaccount (1584) .......................................................................................363,881
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,967,705
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 566,873
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1594) ....................................................................................4,534,578
Personal Service ..................................................................................................170,989
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 63,074
From Natural Resources Protection Fund - Anhydrous Ammonia
Risk Management Plan Subaccount (1554) ........................................................234,063
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,264,974
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 897,297
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) ....................................................................................6,162,271
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,756,139
Expense and Equipment (including $26,428 one-time) ........................... 980,289
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ......................................................................3,736,428
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,663,815
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 319,116
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ..............................................................2,982,931
Personal Service ..................................................................................................606,066
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 52,249
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ........................658,315

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 20
Personal Service ..................................................................................................348,693
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,002
From Coal Combustion Residuals Subaccount (1551) ...................................................375,695
Personal Service ..................................................................................................131,985
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,166
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) .............................173,151
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,102,516
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 90,956
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................. 1,193,472
Total (Not to exceed 741.70 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$55,808,036
Section 6.230. To the Department of Natural Resources
For environmental education and studies, demonstration projects, and
technical assistance grants, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .....................................$350,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................... 350,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$700,000
Section 6.231. To the Department of Natural Resources
For a sewer water infrastructure repair and improvement located in a city
with more than eight hundred fifty-five but fewer than nine
hundred fifty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 6.232. To the Department of Natural Resources
For distribution to a village with more than sixty but fewer than sixty-
seven inhabitants and located in a county with more than four
thousand but fewer than four thousand five hundred inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than eight hundred inhabitants,
for the purchase and installation of a dam pump
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$291,000
Section 6.233. To the Department of Natural Resources

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 21
For a water infrastructure improvement project in a city with more than
one thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand
three hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 6.234. To the Department of Natural Resources
For wastewater improvements and projects for any city with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants
and located in a county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$25,000,000
For planning, design, repair, construction or capital improvements of a
sewer system for any city with more than four thousand four
hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................11,000,000
For stormwater improvements in any county with more than one hundred
fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For the construction, installation, and maintenance of a flood wall and
lift pump for a city with more than one hundred eighty-five but
fewer than two hundred ten inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 400,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$36,900,000
Section 6.235. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 22
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,251,461
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................15,945,000
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) .....................................................266,104,732
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) ....................................433,967,759
From Water Pollution Control (37E) Fund (1330) ...........................................................20,000
From Water Pollution Control (37G) Fund (1329) ...........................................................10,000
From Stormwater Control (37H) Fund (1302) ..................................................................10,000
From Storm Water Loan Revolving Fund (1754) ........................................................2,423,141
From Rural Water and Sewer Loan Revolving Fund (1755) .......................................1,500,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) ............................................................................ 3,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$732,232,093
Section 6.236. To the Department of Natural Resources
For sewer infrastructure improvements for a nursing facility located in
any city with more than six hundred eighty but fewer than seven
hundred sixty inhabitants and located in a county with more than
six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than one
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
For sewer infrastructure improvements for any city with more than six
hundred eighty but fewer than seven hundred sixty inhabitants
and located in a county with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,000,000
For planning, design, repair, construction or capital improvements for a
sewer system located in a village with more than two hundred
sixty but fewer than two hundred ninety-three inhabitants and
located in a county with more than one hundred fifty thousand
but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For sewer infrastructure improvements to a sewer district that serves any
city with more than three thousand four hundred but fewer than
three thousand eight hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 23
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight
thousand but fewer than twelve thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................4,200,000
For planning, design, maintenance, repair or improvements for a sewer
expansion located in any county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................10,000,000
For sewer and wastewater infrastructure improvements for a sewer
treatment facility owned and maintained by any city with more
than fifty-eight thousand but fewer than sixty-four thousand
inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .................................................. 12,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$31,200,000
Section 6.237. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Environmental Quality
For distribution to a city with more than thirty-three thousand but fewer
than thirty-six thousand five hundred inhabitants, for watershed
and stormwater management and erosion mediation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 6.238. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Environmental Quality
For a water infrastructure project located in any village with more than
one hundred forty-eight but fewer than one hundred sixty-five
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty thousand
but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand six
hundred inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$750,000
Section 6.240. To the Department of Natural Resources
For grants and contracts to study or reduce water pollution, improve
ground water and/or surface water quality, provided $9,000,000
be used solely to encumber funds for future fiscal year

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 24
expenditures, and provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ................................$17,497,460
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................3,300,000
For drinking water sampling, analysis, and public drinking water quality
and treatment studies
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .............................................................. 599,852
Total .........................................................................................................................$21,397,312
Section 6.241. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Environmental Quality
Funding shall be appropriated to a city not within a county, to
study opportunities to mitigate flood risk and ecosystem
degradation in the River Des Peres, and provided that the City
shall use the funds to match with other local funds to support a
US Army Corps of Engineers Feasibility Study
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 6.245. To the Department of Natural Resources
For closure of concentrated animal feeding operations
From Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation Indemnity Fund (1834) .......................$60,000
Section 6.250. To the Department of Natural Resources
For grants and contracts for air pollution control activities, provided
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$3,686,494
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................100,000
For grants and contracts for air pollution control activities in accordance
with the department’s beneficiary mitigation plan dated August
6, 2018
From Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Proceeds Fund
(1268) ....................................................................................................... 13,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,286,494
Section 6.255. To the Department of Natural Resources

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 25
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Hazardous Waste Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,070,186 one-time) ....................$1,730,592
Section 6.260. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Radioactive Waste Investigation Fund
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ............................................................................$150,000
Section 6.265. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the cleanup of hazardous waste or substances
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$1,850,000
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ...........................................................................5,665,613
From Radioactive Waste Investigation Fund (1560) ........................................... 150,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,665,613
Section 6.270. To the Department of Natural Resources
For implementation provisions of the Solid Waste Management Law in
accordance with Sections 260.250 through 260.345, RSMo
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ............................................................$7,498,820
From Solid Waste Management Fund - Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ......................2,000,000
For grants to Solid Waste Management Districts for funding community-
based reduce, reuse, and recycle grants
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................... 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,498,820
Section 6.275. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expenditures of forfeited financial assurance instruments to ensure
proper closure and post closure of solid waste landfills, with
general revenue expenditures not to exceed collections pursuant
to Section 260.228, RSMo
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$23,812
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 428,984
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................452,796
For expenditures of forfeited financial assurance instruments to ensure
proper closure and post closure of solid waste landfills, provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 26
Personal Service ......................................................................................................1,440
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 423,973
From Post Closure Fund (1198) ........................................................................... 425,413
Total ..............................................................................................................................$878,209
Section 6.280. To the Department of Natural Resources
For environmental emergency response
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 6.285. To the Department of Natural Resources
For petroleum related activities and environmental emergency response
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,349,023
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 84,680
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) (Not to exceed
21.20 F.T.E.) ..................................................................................................$1,433,703
Section 6.290. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Geological Survey, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.405
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,886,454
Expense and Equipment (including $53,681 one-time) ........................... 1,823,424
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,709,878
For a statewide dam inspector performing inspections of non-agricultural
dams
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,760
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 7,477
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................89,237
For the Missouri Geological Survey, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,233,018
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 501,678
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................2,734,696
Personal Service
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......................22,679
Personal Service ..................................................................................................724,617

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 27
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 97,577
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) ...................................................................822,194
Personal Service ....................................................................................................16,833
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,072
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) .........................................................................................21,905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................231,960
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,480
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................249,440
Personal Service ..................................................................................................185,003
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,010
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................216,013
Personal Service ....................................................................................................17,908
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,105
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .........................................................................22,013
Personal Service ..................................................................................................132,293
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 18,270
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ..........................................................................150,563
Personal Service ....................................................................................................41,522
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,761
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ...............................................55,283
Personal Service ..................................................................................................587,068
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 202,207
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) .................................................................789,275
Expense and Equipment
From Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund (1697) ..................................................................13
Personal Service ......................................................................................................9,498
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,625
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) ........................................................................17,123
Personal Service ..................................................................................................117,134
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,006

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 28
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) .....................................................................129,140
Personal Service ....................................................................................................71,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,401
From Coal Combustion Residuals Subaccount (1551) .....................................................77,256
Personal Service ....................................................................................................13,023
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................15,023
Personal Service .................................................................................................114,617
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,902
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ...........................................118,519
Personal Service ..............................................................................................1,578,552
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 259,791
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................... 1,838,343
Total (Not to exceed 140.58 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,078,593
Section 6.295. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Mined
Land Reclamation Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 6.405
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 6.300. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.405
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$31,937,310
For the Multipurpose Water Resource Program
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ......................................48,187,310
For a drought response plan, water supply availability studies, watershed
feasibility studies and related efforts to protect Missouri’s water
supply interests
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,907,216 one-time) .............. 2,832,136
Total .........................................................................................................................$82,956,756

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 29
Section 6.305. To the Department of Natural Resources
For bond forfeiture funds for the reclamation of mined land
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...............................................................$350,000
For the reclamation of abandoned mined lands
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................9,232,500
For contracts for hydrologic studies to assist small coal operators to meet
permit requirements
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 1,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,583,500
Section 6.310. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expense and equipment in accordance with the provisions of Section
259.190, RSMo
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) ....................................................................$150,000
For abandoned oil and gas well inventory and plugging
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 11,820,949
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,970,949
Section 6.315. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Geological Survey
For demonstration projects and technical assistance related to soil and
water conservation
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$1,000,000
For a program to improve water quality practices
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................514,772
For grants to local soil and water conservation districts
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ............................................................19,680,570
For soil and water conservation cost-share grants
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ............................................................50,000,000
For a conservation monitoring program
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................400,000
For grants to colleges and universities for research projects on soil
erosion and conservation

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 30
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................... 400,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$71,995,342
Section 6.320. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Water Development Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.405
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$600,000
Section 6.325. To the Department of Natural Resources
For interest, operations, and maintenance in accordance with the
Clarence Cannon Water Contract
From Missouri Water Development Fund (1174) ........................................................$600,000
Section 6.330. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 6.405
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$229,950
For the Division of Energy, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is
allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,774,576
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 795,491
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................2,570,067
Personal Service ..................................................................................................893,951
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 150,368
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ............................................................1,044,319
Personal Service ....................................................................................................71,207
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,215
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .........................................................................75,422
Personal Service ....................................................................................................97,578
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,000
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 117,578
Total (Not to exceed 38.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,037,336

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 31
Section 6.335. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Utility Revolving Fund (1874) .......................................................................$12,300,000
Section 6.340. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the promotion of energy, renewable energy, and energy efficiency,
provided $18,000,000 be used solely to encumber funds for
future fiscal year expenditures, and provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ................................$89,754,073
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ..........................................................22,000,000
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ..............................................................................6,000,000
For the Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Program
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 9,948,293
Total .......................................................................................................................$127,702,366
Section 6.341. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy
For energy generation infrastructure for a performing arts and
entertainment complex in a city with more than fifty-one
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 6.342. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy to commission a distributed energy resources
study, which shall include a value of solar study along with the
practical and economic benefits, challenges, and drawbacks of
increased distributed energy generation in the state, and which
shall also include legislative and regulatory recommendations
related thereto to the Governor, the Public Service Commission,
and the General Assembly
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) (one-time) ..............................................................$500,000
Section 6.343. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 32
For the Missouri University of Science and Technology for a small
modular nuclear reactor science and development program
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$3,000,000
Section 6.345. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Wood Energy Tax Credit Program
For the redemption of authorized tax credits applied for between January
1, 2024, and June 30, 2024, and January 1, 2025, and June 30,
2025, under Sections 135.300 through 135.311, RSMo, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 6.405
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,800,000 one-time) ....................$4,800,000
Section 6.346. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the purpose of providing grants for wildfire mitigation studies to not-
for-profit organizations operating under Chapter 394 or as
described in subsection 2 of Section 393.110, RSMo.
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$400,000
Section 6.350. To the Department of Natural Resources
For Missouri State Parks
For State Parks operations, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between federal and other funds and no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$268,712
Personal Service ..................................................................................................141,409
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,825
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................173,234
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,783,847
Expense and Equipment (including $745,676 one-time) ......................... 4,624,425
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................6,408,272
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,052,792
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 68,167
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................1,120,959
Personal Service .............................................................................................29,189,532

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 33
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,477,210
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ...........................................................................40,666,742
Personal Service ..................................................................................................242,885
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 798,977
From Rock Island Trail State Park Endowment Fund (1908) .....................................1,041,862
Personal Service ....................................................................................................78,854
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 75,000
From Doctor Edmund A. Babler Memorial State Park Fund (1911) ..............................153,854
Expense and Equipment
From Meramec-Onondaga State Parks Fund (1698) ........................................................65,000
For State Park Operations
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Stimulus – 2021 Fund
(2449) ..................................................................................................................158,622
For state park support activities and grants and/or loans for recreational
purposes, provided $27,400,000 be used solely to encumber
funds for future fiscal year expenditures
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................35,650,000
For programming that commemorates and interprets the African-
American diaspora through fostering educational and cultural
programs regarding the past, present, and contemporary
contributions of African-Americans who served to shape the city
and state’s history and culture
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................150,000
Levy District Payments .........................................................................................15,000
Payment in Lieu of Taxes .....................................................................................20,000
Bruce R. Watkins Center Expense and Equipment ................................. 100,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ................................................................................135,000
Parks Concession Personal Service ......................................................................80,139
Parks Concession Expense and Equipment ........................................................199,350
Gifts to Parks Expense and Equipment ...............................................................750,000
Parks Resale Expense and Equipment .............................................................1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 34
State Park Grants Expense and Equipment .............................................. 450,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................... 2,479,489
Total (Not to exceed 667.21 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$88,471,746
Section 6.351. To the Department of Natural Resources
For Missouri State Parks
For the purchase of 1,600 or more contiguous acres in a county with more
than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five hundred
but fewer than nine hundred inhabitants, and for the planning,
design, and construction of a state park on said land
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$15,000,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) (one-time) .................................................... 4,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,000,000
Section 6.352. To the Department of Natural Resources
For a 6.8% salary increase for uniformed park rangers
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..............................................................................$175,432
Section 6.355. To the Department of Natural Resources
For Historic Preservation Operations, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.405
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$57,088
For Historic Preservation Operations, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................480,946
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 50,280
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................531,226
Personal Service ..................................................................................................267,282
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,441
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ......................................................298,723
Personal Service ..................................................................................................136,140
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,896
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................147,036

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 35
For historic preservation grants and contracts, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................600,000
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................... 1,339,667
Total (Not to exceed 17.25 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,973,740
Section 6.360. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Historic Preservation Revolving Fund, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.405
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,892,508
Section 6.365. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expenditures of payments received for damages to the state’s natural
resources, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between funds
Expense and Equipment
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ......................................................$4,300,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................... 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,400,000
Section 6.370. To the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund
(1425) .............................................................................................................$3,021,898
Section 6.375. To the Department of Natural Resources
For refunds, provided seventy-five percent (75%) flexibility
is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .........................................$9,445
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................16,038
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................................84,946
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund
(1425) ......................................................................................................................1,419
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) .............................................................165
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ...........................................................................3,478
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) ............................................................................100
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Anhydrous Ammonia Risk

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 36
Management Plan Subaccount (1554) ....................................................................5,400
From Natural Resources Protection Fund– Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) .........................................................................................46,982
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ............................1,165
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .....................................................................1,165
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ....................................................165
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos
Fee Subaccount (1584) ...........................................................................................9,930
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) .................................4,965
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1594) .........................................................................................56,682
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) .............................................10,498
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................25,723
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ........................................................................329
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ...................................................................165
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) .....................................................250
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .......................................................................3,165
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...................................................................2,204
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................59,688
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................14,726
From Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund (1697) ................................................................165
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) .............................................................................650
From Storm Water Loan Revolving Fund (1754) ..................................................................200
From Rural Water and Sewer Loan Revolving Fund (1755) .................................................165
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ..............................................................................4,400
From Confederate Memorial Park Fund (1812) ....................................................................165
From Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation Indemnity Fund (1834) ..............................450
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................10,095
From Doctor Edmund A. Babler Memorial State Park Fund (1911) .....................................417
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 4,500
Total ..............................................................................................................................$380,000
Section 6.380. To the Department of Natural Resources
For sales tax on retail sales, provided seventy-five percent (75%)
flexibility is allowed between funds
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................$30,000
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......... 1,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$31,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 37
Section 6.385. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the DNR
Cost Allocation Fund for real property leases, related services,
utilities, systems furniture, structural modifications, capital
improvements and related expenses, and for the purpose of
funding the consolidation of Information Technology Services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between DNR
Cost Allocation transfer, Cost Allocation HB 13 transfer, and
Cost Allocation Information Technology Services Division
transfer
For Cost Allocation Transfer, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ..................................................$247,459
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................403,127
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................29,211
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................39,440
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................1,054,766
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ........................119,949
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................569,721
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) .................................................5,836
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................64,327
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ...................................................260,131
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................30,462
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1594) .......................................................................................804,740
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) .............................................................................3,655,782
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................205,081
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ............................................................214,697
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..................................................8,334
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .....................................................................92,339
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...............................................................205,193
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................494,523
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................603,829
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ............................................................................16,893
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................80,142
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 22,782
Total DNR Cost Allocation Transfer ...........................................................................9,228,764

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 38
For Cost Allocation HB 13 Transfer, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ........................................................5,109
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..............................................................................7,732
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) .............................................................560
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ..................................................................813
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) .........................................................................................21,764
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ............................2,476
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................11,641
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ......................................................94
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos
Fee Subaccount (1584) ...........................................................................................1,328
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .......................................................5,370
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ....................................629
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1594) .........................................................................................16,613
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................70,107
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .....................................................................3,289
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................................4,432
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) .....................................................172
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .......................................................................1,481
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...................................................................7,316
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................10,103
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................12,465
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) .................................................................................271
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) .....................................................................1,285
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 813
Total Cost Allocation HB 13 Transfer ............................................................................185,863
For Cost Allocation Information Technology Services Division Transfer,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ....................................................163,447
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................182,128
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................13,197
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................26,050
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) .......................................................................................699,258
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ..........................79,226

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 39
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................405,252
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ...............................................10,319
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos
Fee Subaccount (1584) .........................................................................................42,489
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ...................................................172,915
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................20,121
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1594) .......................................................................................531,532
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) .............................................................................1,651,638
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................575,219
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ............................................................141,808
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..................................................5,504
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) .................................................................86,092
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................352,244
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................398,830
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ............................................................................29,866
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 9,558
Total Cost Allocation Information Technology Services
Division Transfer ..................................................................................... 5,596,693
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,011,320
Section 6.390. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology - Federal and Other Fund for the
purpose of funding the consolidation of Information Technology
Services
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$2,693,271
Section 6.395. To the Department of Natural Resources
For all costs incurred in the operation of the authority, including special
studies
Personal Service ................................................................................................$669,567
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 601,196
From State Environmental Improvement Authority Fund (1654) (Not
to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................$1,270,763
Section 6.400. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Board of Trustees for the Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance
Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 40
For the general administration and operation of the fund, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$329,086
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,095,602
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ................................................2,424,688
For investigating and paying claims obligations of the Petroleum Storage
Tank Insurance Fund
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ..............................................20,000,000
For refunds of erroneously collected receipts
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ........................................ 80,000
Total (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$22,504,688
Section 6.405. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for payment of claims, premiums, and
expense as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 6.600. To the Department of Conservation
For Habitat Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$29,119,831
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,028,963
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 525.16
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$54,148,794
Section 6.605. To the Department of Conservation
For Fish and Wildlife Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$34,464,011
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,094,753
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 543.84

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 41
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$49,558,764
Section 6.610. To the Department of Conservation
For Recreation Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,291,562
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,380,846
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 238.62
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$23,672,408
Section 6.615. To the Department of Conservation
For Education and Communication, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$13,196,863
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,145,057
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 222.11
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$24,341,920
Section 6.620. To the Department of Conservation
For Conservation Business Services, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$17,000,347
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,152,465
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 225.68
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$65,152,812
Section 6.625. To the Department of Conservation
For Staff Development and Benefits, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$20,594,328
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,461,114

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 42
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 36.40
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$24,055,442
Section 6.629. To the Department of Conservation
For vehicle checkpoints where motorists may be detained without
individualized reasonable suspicion and related administrative
expenses
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 6.2025. To the Department of Natural Resources
In reference to Section 6.200 through and including Section 6.405
of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be used for the maintenance, rehabilitation,
restoration, and repair of the Missouri Rock Island Trail Corridor
that runs from Windsor to Beaufort, Missouri, on private land in
which the trail runs through or outside of any city, town, or
village limits.
Section 6.2030. To the Department of Conservation
In reference to all sections, except Section 6.629, in Part 1 of this
act:
No funds shall be expended for vehicle checkpoints where
motorists may be detained without individualized reasonable
suspicion, and related administrative expenses.
Department of Agriculture Totals
General Revenue Fund (121.32 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$24,464,374
Federal Funds (50.76 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................16,797,730
Other Funds (335.73 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 32,495,935
Total (507.81 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$73,758,039
Department of Natural Resources Totals
General Revenue Fund (191.20 F.T.E.) .................................................................$162,694,259
Federal Funds (322.91 F.T.E.) .................................................................................189,712,207
Other Funds (1,200.54 F.T.E.) ............................................................................ 954,498,203
Total (1,714.65 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$1,306,904,669

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 6 43
Department of Conservation Totals
General Revenue Fund .............................................................................................................$0
Federal Funds .............................................................................................................................0
Other Funds (1,791.81 F.T.E.) ............................................................................ 240,930,141
Total (1,791.81 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$240,930,141
